Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.212

Employee attendance incentive program—Effect of early retirement.

An employee of a school district that has established an attendance incentive program under RCW 28A.400.210 who retires under section 1 or 3, chapter 234, Laws of 1992, section 1 or 3, chapter 86, Laws of 1993, or section 4 or 6, chapter 519, Laws of 1993, shall receive, at the time of his or her separation from school district employment, not less than one-half of the remuneration for accrued leave for illness or injury payable to him or her under the district's incentive program. The school district board of directors may, at its discretion, pay the remainder of such an employee's remuneration for accrued leave for illness or injury after the time of the employee's separation from school district employment, but the employee or the employee's estate is entitled to receive the remainder of the remuneration no later than the date the employee would have been eligible to retire under the provisions of RCW 41.40.180 or 41.32.480 had the employee continued to work for the district until eligible to retire, or three years following the date of the employee's separation from school district employment, whichever occurs first. A district exercising its discretion under this section to pay the remainder of the remuneration after the time of the employee's separation from school district employment shall establish a policy and procedure for paying the remaining remuneration that applies to all affected employees equally and without discrimination. Any remuneration paid shall be based on the number of days of leave the employee had accrued and the compensation the employee received at the time he or she retired under section 1 or 3, chapter 234, Laws of 1992, section 1 or 3, chapter 86, Laws of 1993, or section 4 or 6, chapter 519, Laws of 1993.

[ 1993 c 519 s 14; 1993 c 86 s 8; 1992 c 234 s 13.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1993 c 86 s 8 and by 1993 c 519 s 14, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Part headings not law—1993 c 519: "Part headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1993 c 519 s 24.]

Effective date—1993 c 519: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 18, 1993]." [ 1993 c 519 s 25.]

Effective date—1993 c 86: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 21, 1993]." [ 1993 c 86 s 9.]